District of Columbia statutes.
38-1011.03

Instructional expertise in implementation of the Program.

(a)

The Mayor shall select certain entities to provide technical instruction and expertise to the Program. The entities shall include trade associations, professional groups, unions, nonprofit organizations, and other groups certified to provide adult technical career training.

(b)

The University of the District of Columbia shall work in conjunction with the Hospitality Public Charter High School at Roosevelt High School, and in partnership with existing adult technical career training programs, to open the Hospitality Public Charter High School at Roosevelt High School for night, weekend, and summer classes and training as one component of the Program.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2173, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2173 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2173 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).